Utah statutes.
59-1-610.   Standard of review of appellate court.

(1)  When reviewing formal adjudicative proceedings commenced before the commission, the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court shall:

(a)  grant the commission deference concerning its written findings of fact, applying a substantial evidence standard on review; and

(b)  grant the commission no deference concerning its conclusions of law, applying a correction of error standard, unless there is an explicit grant of discretion contained in a statute at issue before the appellate court.

(2)  This section supercedes Section 63G-4-403 pertaining to judicial review of formal adjudicative proceedings.

